Hawaii statutes.
§607-23 Fees of commissioners, appraisers,
etc. Fees of commissioners and appraisers shall be such as the court deems
just and reasonable, together with actual and necessary traveling expenses at
the same rate paid for traveling expenses to witnesses subpoenaed, and all
actual disbursements for surveying, plans, etc. [RL 1935, pt of §3793; am L
1941, c 293, §1; RL 1945, §9761; am L 1945, c 37, §2; RL 1955, §219-22; am L
1963, c 85, §3; HRS §607-23; am L 1972, c 88, §5(v)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next